California, session 20252026, AB582.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11370 of the Government Code is amended to read:11370. This chapter, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) constitute, and may be cited as, the Administrative Procedure Act.